Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.53.040

Effective date of merger—Certificate of merger.

(1) A merger that is to result in a trust company shall, unless a later date is specified in the agreement, become effective after the filing with and upon the approval of the director of the executed agreement together with copies of the resolutions of the shareholders of each merging trust company approving it, certified by the trust company's president or manager and the secretary. The charters of the merging trust companies, other than the resulting trust company, shall immediately after that automatically terminate.

(2) The director shall immediately after that issue to the resulting trust company a certificate of merger specifying the name of each merging trust company and the name of the resulting trust company. The certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the merger and of the correctness of all proceedings regarding the merger in all courts and places, and may be recorded in any office for the recording of deeds to evidence the new name in which the property of the merging trust companies is held.

[ 2019 c 389 s 99; 2014 c 37 s 392.]